District of Columbia statutes.
22-3154

Manufacture or possession of a weapon of mass destruction.

(a)

A person who manufactures or possesses a weapon of mass destruction capable of causing multiple deaths, serious bodily injuries to multiple persons, or massive destruction of property may, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment for life.

(b)

A person who attempts or conspires to manufacture or possess a weapon of mass destruction capable of causing multiple deaths, serious bodily injuries to multiple persons, or massive destruction of property may, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment for not more than 30 years.

(c)

In addition to any other penalty provided under this section, a person may be fined an amount not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01.

History

Oct. 17, 2002, D.C. Law 14-194, § 104, 49 DCR 5306
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 307(a), 60 DCR 2064

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added (c).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 307(a) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.